Washington statutes.
RCW 43.08.110

Fiscal agent for state—Fiscal agent's receipts.

The fiscal agent shall issue the necessary receipts for all moneys collected, and such receipts shall show the date when paid, the amount, from whom received, and on what account the money was collected.

One or more copies of such receipt shall be given to the persons from whom the money was received, and one copy shall be given to the director of financial management.

[ 1979 c 151 s 90; 1965 c 8 s 43.08.110. Prior: 1891 c 138 s 3; RRS s 5486.]